test/src/morphology/N-J-МО_В-муравей_gt-norm.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup
Tests:
# todo:
# Proofread the gold standard (below)
# Then: run analyser, then correct. 

  Noun - муравей M anim : # Noun - full paradigm
      муравей+N+Msc+Sg+Nom: мураве́й
      муравей+N+Msc+Sg+Acc+Anim: муравья́
      муравей+N+Msc+Sg+Gen: муравья́
      муравей+N+Msc+Sg+Loc: муравье́
      муравей+N+Msc+Sg+Dat: муравью́
      муравей+N+Msc+Sg+Ins: муравьём
      муравей+N+Msc+Pl+Nom: муравьи́
      муравей+N+Msc+Pl+Acc+Anim: муравьёв
      муравей+N+Msc+Pl+Gen: муравьёв
      муравей+N+Msc+Pl+Loc: муравья́х
      муравей+N+Msc+Pl+Dat: муравья́м
      муравей+N+Msc+Pl+Ins: муравья́ми
